Connecticut, session 2026, SB00113.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
five million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for the purpose of
providing grants-in-aid to farms associated with new anaerobic
digesters to provide the necessary changes to manure management
systems.